Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3532
Certificates; replacement; fee.

A new certificate of licensure or certificate of authorization to replace any certificate lost, destroyed, or mutilated may be issued by the board. A fee not to exceed one hundred dollars shall be charged for each issuance.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 79.